District of Columbia statutes.
2-1103

Priority projects.

The Congress further declares that, in carrying out the policy pursuant to § 2-1102 for the attainment of the objective established by § 2-1101, priority should be given to the solution, on a unified metropolitan basis, of the problems of water supply, sewage disposal, and water pollution and transportation.

June 27, 1960, 74 Stat. 223, Pub. L. 86-527, § 4
1981 Ed., § 1-2103.
1973 Ed., § 1-1303.